Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 6A Medical Review Committees

Editor’s notes.

The provisions contained in Code Sections 31-7-140 through 31-7-143, as enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, were previously enacted in substantially similar form by Ga. L. 1975, p. 739 but were not included as part of the original Code enactment (Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8).

31-7-140.
“Medical review committee” defined.

As used in this article, the term “medical review committee” means a committee of a state or local professional society or of a medical staff or a licensed hospital, nursing home, medical foundation, or peer review committee, provided the medical staff operates pursuant to written bylaws that have been approved by the governing board of the hospital or nursing home, which committee is formed to evaluate and improve the quality of health care rendered by providers of health service or to determine that health services rendered were professionally indicated or were performed in compliance with the applicable standard of care or that the cost of health care rendered was considered reasonable by the providers of professional health services in the area.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 739, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-7-140

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 22.

31-7-141.
Committee members immune from liability.

There shall be no monetary liability on the part of and no cause of action for damages shall arise against any member of a duly appointed medical review committee for any act or proceeding undertaken or performed within the scope of the functions of any such committee if the committee member acts without malice or fraud. This immunity shall apply only to actions by providers of health services, and in no way shall this Code section render any medical review committee immune from any action in tort or contract brought by a patient or his successors or assigns. This Code section shall not affect the immunity of an officer or an employee of a public corporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 739, § 2; Code 1981, §

31-7-141

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 22.

Cross references.

Immunity of persons furnishing information to peer review groups from civil liability, §

31-7-130

et seq.

31-7-142.
Liability of those providing health care facilities or services.

Code Section 31-7-141 shall not be construed to confer immunity from liability on any professional society or hospital or upon any health professional while performing services other than as a member of a medical review committee. In any case in which, except for this article, a cause of action would arise against a hospital, professional society, or any individual health professional, such cause of action shall exist as if this article had not been enacted.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 739, § 3; Code 1981, §

31-7-142

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 22.

31-7-143.
Committee proceedings and records immune from discovery or use as evidence in civil actions.

The proceedings and records of medical review committees shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action against a provider of professional health services arising out of the matters which are the subject of evaluation and review by such committee; and no person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any such civil action as to any evidence or other matters produced or presented during the proceedings of such committee or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of such committee or any members thereof. However, information, documents, or records otherwise available from original sources shall not be construed as immune from discovery or use in any such civil action merely because they were presented during proceedings of such committee; nor shall any person who testifies before such committee or who is a member of such committee be prevented from testifying as to matters within his knowledge, provided that such witness may not be questioned regarding his testimony before such a committee or opinions formed by him as a result of such committee hearings.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 739, § 4; Code 1981, §

31-7-143

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 22.